Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3816
Corporation; investments; limitation.

A corporation organized under sections 44-3801 to 44-3826 shall invest its funds as provided by Chapter 44 and its investments shall be valued as provided by Chapter 44. The investments shall exceed its liabilities and reserves except for claim liability covered by contracting dentist guarantees, and it shall be a continuing condition of licensing by the director that such solvency be maintained.

Laws 1982, LB 139, § 16.